California, session 20252026, AB802.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 229.4 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:229.4. (a) In order to prevent and address hunger of youth held in county confinement, to ascertain whether the nutritional needs of those youth are being met, to make public recommendations to prevent hunger and to promote healthy development of those youth, and ultimately to provide for the nutritional needs of those youth, a juvenile justice commission shall administer, or work with a local community-based organization to administer, at least once every 24 months, a survey of youth younger than 26 years of age who are confined in county juvenile halls, camps, and other facilities used for the confinement of youth. (b) A survey administered pursuant to subdivision (a) shall seek to ascertain whether confined youth are chronically or often hungry, whether confined youth have regular access to food between meals, whether confined youth have adequate time for meals, and the quality of the food confined youth are provided.(c) If results of each survey administered pursuant to subdivision (a) indicate that confined youth are often or chronically hungry, the juvenile justice commission shall make recommendations for changes to county policies to address that hunger. When making recommendations, the juvenile justice commission shall take the following into account:(1) Providing sufficient calories to meet youths’ minimum caloric needs, by itself, is not adequate to address hunger and nutrition in county confinement facilities.(2) Physically active confined youth who are preparing for, or participating in, rigorous activities, including, but not limited to, support for fire prevention or suppression, shall be assumed to be in need of additional healthy food to prevent hunger and to promote healthy development.(3) Confined youth and their families shall not be responsible for the costs of addressing the hunger and nutritional needs of confined youth and those costs shall not be passed on to confined youth or their families. The cost of meals, snacks, and necessary food is the responsibility of the counties.(d) The results of each survey administered pursuant to subdivision (a) and any recommendations made pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be published on the internet website of the juvenile justice commission. If the county takes remedial or corrective actions to address issues found as a result of the survey, a description of the remedial or corrective action shall be published on the internet website of the county probation department.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.